Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.12.030

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Eligible institution" means any postsecondary institution in this state accredited by the Northwest Association of Schools and Colleges, or a campus of a member institution of an accrediting association recognized by rule of the student achievement council for purposes of this section, that is eligible for federal student financial aid assistance and has operated as a nonprofit college or university delivering on-site classroom instruction for a minimum of twenty consecutive years within the state of Washington, or any public technical college in the state.

(2) "Financial need" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.92.030.

(3) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.

[ 2024 c 182 s 1; 2019 c 406 s 26; 2017 c 52 s 1; 2012 c 229 s 519; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 142; 2002 c 187 s 2; 1994 c 130 s 3; 1974 ex.s. c 177 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 177: See note following RCW 28B.12.010.